Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 4
C

OASTAL MARSHLANDS

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Coastal marshlands protection, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-2-3.

Law reviews.

-
For article, "Georgia's Environmental Law: A Survey," see 23 Mercer L. Rev. 633 (1972). For article, "Public Rights in Georgia's Tidelands," see 9 Ga. L. Rev. 79 (1974). For article, "Hazardous Waste Issues in Real Estate Transactions," see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 581 (1987). For article, "Georgia Wetlands:
Values, Trends, and Legal Status," see 41 Mercer L. Rev. 791 (1990).
For note, "Regulation and Ownership of the Marshlands: The Georgia Marshlands Act," see 5 Ga. L. Rev. 563 (1971). For note discussing the historical aspects and current law concerning the state's ownership rights in tidelands, see 17 Ga. L. Rev. 851 (1983). For note on 1992 amendment of this part, see 9 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 205 (1992).

12-5-280. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the "Coastal Marshlands Protection Act of 1970."

(Ga. L. 1970, p. 939, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2294, § 1.)

Law reviews.

-
For article, "From Marshes to Mountains, Wetlands Come Under State Regulation," see 41 Mercer L. Rev. 865 (1990). For annual survey of law on administrative law, see 62 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2010). For article, "The Chevron Two-Step in Georgia's Administrative Law," see 46 Ga. L. Rev. 871 (2012). For annual survey on administrative law, see 64 Mercer L. Rev. 39 (2012).
For comment, " â€˜Wrest' in Peace:
The Effect of the Georgia Environmental Protection Division's 'Wrested Vegetation Rule' on Coastal Salt Marshes," see 32 Georgia St. U.L. Rev. 953 (2016).

12-5-281. Legislative findings and declarations.

The General Assembly finds and declares that the coastal marshlands of Georgia comprise a vital natural resource system.
It is recognized that the estuarine area of Georgia is the habitat of many species of marine life and wildlife and, without the food supplied by the marshlands, such marine life and wildlife cannot survive.
The General Assembly further finds that intensive marine research has revealed that the estuarine marshlands of coastal Georgia are among the richest providers of nutrients in the world. Such marshlands provide a nursery for commercially and recreationally important species of shellfish and other wildlife, provide a great buffer against flooding and erosion, and help control and disseminate pollutants.
Also, it is found that the coastal marshlands provide a natural recreation resource which has become vitally linked to the economy of Georgia's coastal zone and to that of the entire state.
The General Assembly further finds that this coastal marshlands resource system is costly, if not impossible, to reconstruct or rehabilitate once adversely affected by man related activities and is important to conserve for the present and future use and enjoyment of all citizens and visitors to this state.
The General Assembly further finds that the coastal marshlands are a vital area of the state and are essential to maintain the health, safety, and welfare of all the citizens of the state. Therefore, the General Assembly declares that the management of the coastal marshlands has more than local significance, is of equal importance to all citizens of the state, is of state-wide concern, and consequently is properly a matter for regulation under the police power of the state.
The General Assembly further finds and declares that activities and structures in the coastal marshlands must be regulated to ensure that the values and functions of the coastal marshlands are not impaired and to fulfill the responsibilities of each generation as public trustees of the coastal marshlands for succeeding generations.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-281

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2294, § 1.)

12-5-282. Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

"Applicant" means any person who files an application under this part.

"Board" means the Board of Natural Resources.

"Coastal marshlands" or "marshlands" means any marshland intertidal area, mud flat, tidal water bottom, or salt marsh in the State of Georgia within the estuarine area of the state, whether or not the tidewaters reach the littoral areas through natural or artificial watercourses. "Vegetated marshlands" shall include those areas upon which grow one, but not necessarily all, of the following: salt marsh grass (Spartina alterniflora), black needlerush (Juncus roemerianus), saltmeadow cordgrass (Spartina patens), big cordgrass (Spartina cynosuroides), saltgrass (Distichlis spicata), coast dropseed (Sporobolus virginicus), bigelow glasswort (Salicornia bigelovii), woody glasswort (Salicornia virginica), saltwort (Batis maritima), sea lavender (Limonium nashii), sea oxeye (Borrichia frutescens), silverling (Baccharis halimifolia), false willow (Baccharis angustifolia), and high-tide bush (Iva frutescens). The occurrence and extent of salt marsh peat at the undisturbed surface shall be deemed to be conclusive evidence of the extent of a salt marsh or a part thereof.

"Commissioner" means the commissioner of natural resources.

"Committee" means the Coastal Marshlands Protection Committee created by this part.

"Eligible person" means any person who is the owner of high land adjoining the state owned marshland or water bottoms, or combination thereof, sought to be leased by said person such that at least 100 percent of the landward boundary of the state owned marshland or water bottom, or combination thereof, sought to be leased is bordered by said adjoining high land.

"Estuarine area" means all tidally influenced waters, marshes, and marshlands lying within a tide-elevation range from 5.6 feet above mean tide level and below.

(7.1) "Letter of permission" means written authorization from the department to conduct a proposed activity in an area subject to the jurisdiction of this part, provided such activity is either within the physical perimeter of an existing serviceable project or involves the construction and removal of a project or other temporary activity that concludes within six months, inclusive of the time needed to return all affected areas to a condition approximate to, or better than, that which existed prior to the commencement of such activity.

Reserved.

"Minor alteration" means any change in the marshlands which, taken singularly or in combination with other changes, involve less than 0.10 acres. Minor alteration also includes renewal of permits previously issued by the committee.

"Person" means any individual, partnership, corporation, municipal corporation, county, association, or public or private authority, and shall include the State of Georgia, its political subdivisions, and all its departments, boards, bureaus, commissions, or other agencies, unless specifically exempted by this part.

"Political subdivision" means the governing authority of a county or a municipality in which the marshlands to be affected or any part thereof are located.

"Private dock" means a structure built onto or over the marsh and submerged lands which is used for recreational fishing and other recreational activities, is not available to the public, does not have enclosures, and does not create a navigation hazard; provided, however, that a private dock may be covered and screened with wainscotting not higher than three feet and may be equipped with a hoist.

"Serviceable" means usable as is or with only minor maintenance but not so degraded as to essentially require reconstruction, as determined by the department.

(Ga. L. 1970, p. 939, § 2; Code 1981, §

12-5-281

; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 12; Ga. L. 1989, p. 574, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 12; Code 1981, §

12-5-282

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2294, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1074, § 2/SB 319; Ga. L. 2013, p. 874, § 4/HB 402; Ga. L. 2019, p. 741, § 4/HB 201.)

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, substituted "Reserved" for the former provisions of paragraph (8), which read: " 'Live-aboard' means a floating vessel or other watercraft capable of safe, mechanically propelled navigation under average Georgia coastal wind and current conditions which is utilized as a human or animal abode and is located at a marina or a mooring area established by the department."

12-5-283. Coastal Marshlands Protection Committee created; members; powers; per diem and expenses; administrative hearings and review; permits for minor alterations.

There is created the Coastal Marshlands Protection Committee to be composed of five members. The commissioner of natural resources and four persons selected by the board shall be the members of this committee. Each of three persons selected by the board shall be a resident of Camden, Glynn, McIntosh, Liberty, Bryan, or Chatham County. Three members of the committee shall constitute a quorum. The committee shall issue all orders and shall grant, deny, revoke, and amend all permits and leases provided for by this part. The members of the committee shall be entitled to reimbursement of actual expenses and mileage together with a per diem as set by the board to be paid out of funds appropriated for use by the department.

Any person who is aggrieved or adversely affected by any order or action of the committee shall, upon petition within 30 days after the issuance of such order or the taking of such action, have a right to a hearing before an administrative law judge appointed by the board. The hearing before the administrative law judge shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the "Georgia Administrative Procedure Act," and the rules and regulations adopted by the board pursuant thereto. The decision of the administrative law judge shall constitute the final decision of the board and any party to the hearing, including the committee, shall have the right of judicial review thereof in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50.

Persons are "aggrieved or adversely affected" where the challenged action has caused or will cause them injury in fact and where the injury is to an interest within the zone of interests to be protected or regulated by this part. In the event the committee asserts in response to the petition before the administrative law judge that the petitioner is not aggrieved or adversely affected, the administrative law judge shall take evidence and hear arguments on this issue and thereafter make a ruling on this issue before continuing with the hearing. The burden of going forward with evidence on this issue shall rest with the petitioner.

Any permit for minor alteration of the marshlands may be issued by the commissioner based on the recommendations of staff, past committee actions, and the results of public comments. The commissioner may refer the application to the committee to decide on permits for minor alterations that, in his judgment, should receive broader consideration. A committee member may choose to have the full committee decide on permit applications for minor alterations that the member feels should receive broader consideration.

(Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 17; Ga. L. 1973, p. 564, § 1; Code 1981, §

12-5-282

; Ga. L. 1984, p. 404, § 5; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1465, § 3; Ga. L. 1989, p. 574, § 2; Code 1981, §

12-5-283

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2294, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 400, § 2.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1989, a comma was inserted following "Act" in the second sentence of subsection (b).

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Procedures for disposition of contested cases, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-1-2.

Law reviews.

-
For article surveying Georgia cases dealing with environment, natural resources, and land use from June 1977 through May 1978, see 30 Mercer L. Rev. 75 (1978). For annual survey of law on administrative law, see 62 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2010).

12-5-284. Authority of department as to coastal marshlands generally.

The department shall have the following authority:

To administer and enforce this part and all rules, regulations, and orders promulgated under this part and to determine jurisdiction under this part;

To accept moneys that are available from persons, government units, and private organizations;

To conduct public hearings and institute and prosecute court actions as may be necessary to enforce compliance with this part and any rules and regulations promulgated hereunder, provided that all such actions shall be in the name of the department;

To issue letters of permission and impose a reasonable fee for processing such letters of permission; and

To exercise all incidental powers necessary to carry out the purposes of this part.

The foregoing powers and duties may be exercised and performed by the department through such duly authorized agents and employees as it deems necessary and proper.

(Ga. L. 1970, p. 939, § 4; Ga. L. 1972, p. 991, § 1; Code 1981, §

12-5-283

; Code 1981, §

12-5-284

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2294, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 874, § 5/HB 402.)

12-5-285. Power of board to promulgate rules and regulations.

The board shall have power to promulgate rules and regulations for the implementation and enforcement of this part.

(Ga. L. 1970, p. 939, § 4; Code 1981, §

12-5-284

; Code 1981,§

12-5-285

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2294, § 1.)

12-5-286. Permit required; application; notice; public hearing; issuance; denial; dynamic dune fields.

No person shall remove, fill, dredge, drain, or otherwise alter any marshlands or construct or locate any structure on or over marshlands in this state within the estuarine area thereof without first obtaining a permit from the committee or, in the case of minor alteration of marshlands, the commissioner. A permit may authorize the construction or maintenance of the project proposed in an application. After construction pursuant to a permit, a project may be maintained without an additional permit so long as it does not further alter the natural topography or vegetation at the project site and remains in serviceable condition.

No permit shall be required for any activity conducted pursuant to a letter of permission. At least 15 days prior to the commencement of any activity authorized pursuant to a letter of permission, the department shall provide public notice describing such activity and the location thereof; provided, however, that public notice shall not be required for any such activity that is necessary for public safety or the delivery of public services.

Each application for such permit shall be properly executed and filed with the department on forms prescribed by the department and shall include:

The name and address of the applicant;

A plan or drawing showing the applicant's proposal and the manner or method by which such proposal shall be accomplished. Such plan shall identify the coastal marshlands affected;

A plat of the area in which the proposed work will take place;

A copy of the deed or other instrument under which the applicant claims title to the property or, if the applicant is not the owner, then a copy of the deed or other instrument under which the owner claims title together with written permission from the owner to carry out the project on his land. In lieu of a deed or other instrument referred to in this paragraph, the committee may accept some other reasonable evidence of ownership of the property in question or other lawful authority to make use of the property. The committee will not adjudicate title disputes concerning the property which is the subject of the application; provided, however, that the committee may decline to process an application when submitted documents show conflicting deeds;

A list of all adjoining landowners together with such owners' addresses, provided that if the names or addresses of adjoining landowners cannot be determined, the applicant shall file in lieu thereof a sworn affidavit that a diligent search, including, without limitation, a search of the records of the county tax assessor's office, has been made but that the applicant was not able to ascertain the names or addresses, as the case may be, of adjoining landowners;

A letter from the local governing authority of the political subdivision in which the property is located, stating that the applicant's proposal is not violative of any zoning law;

A nonrefundable application fee to be set by the board in an amount necessary to defray the administrative cost of issuing such permit. Renewal fees shall be equal to application fees, which shall not exceed $1,000.00 for any one proposal and shall be paid to the department;

A description from the applicant of alternative sites and why they are not feasible and a discussion of why the permit should be granted;

A statement from the applicant that he has made inquiry to the appropriate authorities that the proposed project is not over a landfill or hazardous waste site and that the site is otherwise suitable for the proposed project;

A copy of the water quality certification issued by the department if required for the proposed project;

Certification by the applicant of adherence to soil and erosion control responsibilities if required for the proposed project; and

Such additional information as is required by the committee to properly evaluate the application.

A copy of each application for a permit shall be delivered to each member of the committee at least seven days prior to any meeting of the committee.

The department, after receipt of an application, shall notify in writing all adjoining landowners that the application has been received. Such notice shall indicate the use the applicant proposes to make of the property. Should the applicant indicate that any adjoining landowner is unknown or that the address of such landowner is unknown, then the department shall, after receipt of a completed application, cause a notice of the proposed activity and a brief description of the affected land to be published in the legal organ of or a newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties in which such land lies. Cost of such publication shall be paid by the applicant. Should the property to be affected by the applicant be bordered on any side or on more than one side by other property of the applicant, the applicant shall supply the names and addresses of the nearest landowners whose land borders on his land. If the names or addresses, or both, of the nearest landowners cannot be ascertained, the applicant shall supply a sworn statement of diligent search as provided in this Code section. The landowners named by the applicant shall be notified either directly or by advertisement as provided in this Code section. The department may also make inquiry to adjoining landowners to ascertain whether or not there is objection to issuance of a permit.

The committee shall provide notice of applications by either public notice distributed jointly with the United States Army Corps of Engineers or public notice distributed by the committee. In no instance shall a public notice be issued for less than seven days prior to the meeting at which the committee reviews the subject of the public notice. Public notices shall be distributed to all persons who have requested to be placed on the mailing list. Such request shall be made in writing and shall be renewed in December of each year. Failure to renew the request shall result in the removal of such name from the mailing list.

Whenever there appears to be sufficient public interest, the committee may call a public hearing.

In passing upon the application for permit, the committee shall consider the public interest, which, for purposes of this part, shall be deemed to be the following considerations:

Whether or not unreasonably harmful obstruction to or alteration of the natural flow of navigational water within the affected area will arise as a result of the proposal;

Whether or not unreasonably harmful or increased erosion, shoaling of channels, or stagnant areas of water will be created; and

Whether or not the granting of a permit and the completion of the applicant's proposal will unreasonably interfere with the conservation of fish, shrimp, oysters, crabs, clams, or other marine life, wildlife, or other resources, including but not limited to water and oxygen supply.

It is the responsibility of the applicant to demonstrate to the committee that the proposed alteration is not contrary to the public interest and that no feasible alternative sites exist. If the committee finds that the application is not contrary to the public interest and no feasible alternative sites exist, as specified in this subsection, it shall issue to the applicant a permit. Such permit may be conditioned upon the applicant's amending the proposal to take whatever measures are necessary to protect the public interest.

The committee shall act upon an application for a permit within 90 days after the application is complete; provided, however, that this provision may be waived upon the written request of the applicant. An application must be complete sufficiently in advance of the committee meeting at which the project will be considered to allow for public notice and evaluation by the department. An application is complete when it contains substantially all of the written information, documents, forms, fees, and materials required by this part.

In the event a majority of the members of the committee determine that a permit should be denied, the application for permit shall be denied. Any applicant who is aggrieved or adversely affected thereby shall have the right to appeal as provided in Code Section 12-5-283.

Should a majority of the members of the committee agree that a permit should be conditional, the permit shall be issued on such conditions as a majority of the committee directs. Any applicant who is aggrieved or adversely affected thereby shall have the right to appeal as provided in Code Section 12-5-283.

Every permit shall require that the proposed project be completed within five years after the date of the issuance of the permit and such permit shall expire five years after the date of issuance. Such time may be extended an additional five years upon showing that all due efforts and diligence toward the completion of the work have been made. Any permit may be revoked by the committee for noncompliance with or for violation of its terms after written notice of intention to do so has been furnished to the holder thereof.

A permit to alter marshlands that has been granted by the committee becomes final immediately upon issuance, but no construction or alteration may commence until the expiration of 30 days following the date of the committee meeting at which the application is approved; provided, however, that if a timely appeal is filed, no construction or alteration may commence until all administrative and judicial proceedings are terminated.

Issuance of a permit under this part and construction of the permitted project shall not remove the designated property from the jurisdiction of this part. All changes in permitted uses which increase impacts to any land subject to the provisions of this part must be assessed by the committee to determine if the proposed change is consistent with this part and the permit. Each permitted alteration of marshlands shall be reviewed by the department on a five-year basis, or when noncompliance with the purpose for which the permit was issued is evident, to determine if the use of the marshland is consistent with the intent of this part. If the permit holder is found not to be in compliance with this part, the committee shall take action as authorized under Code Section 12-5-291.

All plans, documents, and materials contained in any application for any permit required by this part shall be made a part of the permit, if granted, and conformance to such plans, documents, and materials shall be a condition of the permit. No change or deviation from any such plans, documents, or materials shall be permitted without the prior notification and approval of the committee.

The permittee shall notify the department of completion of a project within 30 days of completion.

If, prior to completion of review of an application under this part, the committee receives notice of the denial of a permit or authorization necessary for the project, review of the project shall be suspended and, if the denial becomes final, the application shall stand denied.

If an area has both marshlands as defined in Code Section

12-5-282

and dynamic dune fields as defined in Code Section

12-5-232

, it shall be subject to the jurisdiction of both such parts. In the event of a conflict between this part and Part 2 of this article, the commissioner shall determine which part shall apply so as to best protect the public interest.

(Ga. L. 1970, p. 939, § 5; Code 1981, §

12-5-285

; Code 1981, §

12-5-286

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2294, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 874, § 6/HB 402.)

Law reviews.

-
For annual survey on administrative law, see 64 Mercer L. Rev. 39 (2012).

12-5-287. Leasing of state owned marshland or water bottoms.

The committee, acting for and on behalf of and in the name of the state, is further authorized and empowered to grant and convey to any eligible person a lease of state owned marshland or water bottoms, or a combination thereof, upon such terms and conditions as the committee deems advisable for the purpose of constructing, operating, and maintaining thereupon a marina or marinas or dock providing more than 500 linear feet of dock space, including the installing, maintaining, repairing, removing, and replacing of buildings, structures, piers, docks, floating docks, marine railways, dolphins, pilings, appurtenances thereto, and all facilities and improvements that shall be reasonably used for or in connection therewith, subject always to the initial and continuing compliance by the lessee with all applicable laws pertaining to the use of the leased property and subject always to the use and enjoyment of the public of any navigable waters upon or over the leased property. The applicant for any such lease shall inform the committee of the total linear footage of dock space proposed, but the final decision as to the total dock space available to moor boats shall be in the sound discretion of the committee.

Upon application by any interested person for a lease pursuant to this Code section, the committee shall determine whether or not the applicant is an eligible person. The committee must also determine whether or not the applicant has sufficient lands properly to service the area to be leased. If the committee determines that the applicant is an eligible person and that sufficient lands exist to service the marina or dock, then the committee is authorized to grant and convey to the applicant a lease of the state owned marshland or water bottoms, or a combination thereof, described in the application without the necessity of public bid.

The application for the lease shall be in writing and shall contain a request for a lease of the state owned property described therein. Such application shall include all of the information required for a permit under this part. The entire application must be in a form acceptable to the committee.

Each lease granted under this Code section shall be upon such provisions, requirements, and conditions as the committee shall make and shall, except as provided in subsection (h) of this Code section, provide for a primary term of not more than ten years. Each lease, except as provided in subsection (h) of this Code section, shall require the payment of an annual rental fee which, as of May 5, 2009, shall be $1,000.00 per acre, which acreage shall consist of the covered area of dock structures and a ten-foot buffer surrounding such dock structures; and the committee shall in each calendar year thereafter adjust the amount of the annual rental fee per acre to reflect the effect of annual inflation or deflation for the immediately preceding calendar year in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the board, which rules and regulations may use for this purpose the Consumer Price Index as reported by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor or any other similar index established by the federal government, if the board determines that such federal index reflects the effect of inflation and deflation on the lessees. Except as provided in subsection (h) of this Code section, an initial lease shall be for the annual fee in effect and established by the committee at the time such lease is entered into. Such lease shall be adjusted annually thereafter as provided in this subsection. Each lease may provide for two renewal terms, each of which shall not be for a term of more than equal duration to the primary term. Rental fees shall be paid in one installment to the department not later than July 15 of each year. A penalty of 10 percent of the annual rental shall be assessed for late payment. Failure to pay rental by August 1 of the year due shall result in the cancellation of the lease.

Each lease granted under this Code section shall protect the interest of owners of marshland and high land adjoining the high land of the lessee upon which the lessee's eligibility for lease was based to a right of access to the state owned marshland or water bottoms adjoining the state owned marshland or water bottoms leased to the applicant; provided, however, said owners of adjoining high land may assign their rights in writing in favor of the applicant and such written assignment may be used to determine the percentage of landward boundary required for eligibility to lease the state owned marshland and water bottoms described in the application.

If the eligible person desires the ability to transfer or convey ownership interests in the leasehold to individuals purchasing or leasing on a long-term basis the slips of the marina or marinas, each lease granted under this Code section shall require the formation of a condominium pursuant to Code Section 44-3-72.

Reserved.

Upon application of any eligible person who is either a nonprofit corporation, a nonprofit organization, or a public entity, the committee may grant a lease of state owned marshland or water bottoms for the construction and operation of a marina as a community or public dock. Each lease granted under this subsection shall be for a term of ten years from the date of its execution with a nominal rental of $1.00 for the entire term.

The department shall make an annual report of its activities each calendar year to the General Assembly. The report shall include a summary of all applications received and leases granted, including length of terms, rentals, and locations. Copies of the annual report shall be provided to the director of the State Properties Commission, the chairperson of the House Natural Resources and Environment Committee, the chairperson of the House Committee on State Properties, the chairperson of the Senate Natural Resources and the Environment Committee, and the chairperson of the Senate Committee on State and Local Governmental Operations. The department shall not be required to distribute copies of the annual report to the members of the General Assembly but shall notify the members of the availability of the annual report in the manner which it deems to be most effective and efficient.

The committee may place such terms, limitations, restrictions, and conditions in such leases as are deemed necessary to ensure that the utilization of the property is in the public interest. Leased areas shall be deemed to be areas where resources are managed by the state and lessee for the protection of wildlife and other natural resources.

The committee may designate staff of the department to act on its behalf to evaluate, enforce, and execute leases issued under this part.

A lease granted under this part shall be issued only to applicants who agree not to discriminate against any person on the basis of race, gender, color, national origin, religion, or disability. Discrimination by lessee may be punished by termination of the lease, by injunction, or by any other legal remedy available to the committee.

(Code 1981, § 12-5-285.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 574, § 3; Code 1981, §

12-5-287

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2294, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 12; Ga. L. 1995, p. 462, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1036, § 6/SB 49; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 12/SB 465; Ga. L. 2009, p. 778, § 1/HB 170; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 12/HB 79; Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 2-4/HB 252.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2009, "May 5, 2009" was substituted for "the effective date of this subsection" in the second sentence of subsection (d).

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2009, p. 778,

§

3/HB 170, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall not be applied to impair an obligation of contract entered into prior to May 5, 2009.

12-5-288. Restriction on granting of permits; size restriction; activities and structures considered contrary to public interest.

If the project is not water related or dependent on waterfront access or can be satisfied by the use of an alternative nonmarshland site or by use of existing public facilities, a permit usually should not be granted pursuant to Code Section 12-5-286.

The amount of marshlands to be altered must be minimum in size. The following activities and structures are normally considered to be contrary to the public interest when located in coastal marshlands but the final decision as to whether any activity or structure is considered to be in the public interest shall be in the sound discretion of the committee:

Filling of marshlands for residential, commercial, and industrial uses;

Filling of marshlands for private parking lots and private roadways;

Construction of dump sites and depositing of any waste materials or dredge spoil;

Dredging of canals or ditches for the purpose of draining coastal marshlands;

Mining;

Construction of lagoons or impoundments for waste treatment, cooling, agriculture, or aquaculture which would occupy or damage coastal marshlands or life forms therein; and

Construction of structures which constitute an obstruction of view to adjoining riparian landowners, including signs and enclosures.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-288

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2294, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1074, § 3/SB 319; Ga. L. 2019, p. 741, § 5/HB 201.)

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, added "and" at the end of paragraph (b)(6); substituted a period for "; and" at the end of paragraph (b)(7); and deleted former paragraph (b)(8), which read: "Occupying a live-aboard for more than 90 days during any calendar year; provided, however, that the commissioner may grant extensions of time beyond 90 days to persons making a request in writing stating the reasons for such extension. Owners of docks where live-aboards are moored as well as owners and occupants of live-aboards are responsible under this part".

12-5-289. Inspection of marshlands.

The department, through its officers, staff, and game wardens, shall, in addition to its other duties prescribed by law, make reasonable inspections of the marshlands to ascertain whether the requirements of this part and the rules, regulations, and permits promulgated or issued under this part are being faithfully complied with.

(Ga. L. 1970, p. 939, § 6; Code 1981, §

12-5-286

; Code 1981, §

12-5-289

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2294, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 808, § 7/SB 72.)

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted "game wardens" for "conservation rangers" near the beginning of this Code section.

12-5-290. Jurisdiction to restrain violation of part.

The superior court of the county in which land or any part thereof lies or in which jurisdiction is appropriate shall have jurisdiction to restrain a violation of this part at the action of any person.

(Ga. L. 1970, p. 939, § 7; Code 1981, §

12-5-287

; Code 1981, §

12-5-290

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2294, § 1.)